Washington statutes.
RCW 43.43.680

Controlled substance, simulator solution analysis—Prima facie evidence.

(1) In all prosecutions involving the analysis of a controlled substance or a sample of a controlled substance by the crime laboratory system of the state patrol, a certified copy of the analytical report signed by the supervisor of the state patrol's crime laboratory or the forensic scientist conducting the analysis is prima facie evidence of the results of the analytical findings.

(2) The defendant or a prosecutor may subpoena the forensic scientist who conducted the analysis of the substance to testify at the preliminary hearing and trial of the issue at no cost to the defendant, if the subpoena is issued at least ten days prior to the trial date.

(3) In all prosecutions involving the analysis of a certified simulator solution by the Washington state toxicology laboratory of the University of Washington, a certified copy of the analytical report signed by the state toxicologist or the toxicologist conducting the analysis is prima facie evidence of the results of the analytical findings, and of certification of the simulator solution used in the BAC verifier datamaster or any other alcohol/breath-testing equipment subsequently adopted by rule.

(4) The defendant of a prosecution may subpoena the toxicologist who conducted the analysis of the simulator solution to testify at the preliminary hearing and trial of the issue at no cost to the defendant, if thirty days prior to issuing the subpoena the defendant gives the state toxicologist notice of the defendant's intention to require the toxicologist's appearance.

[ 1994 c 271 s 501; 1992 c 129 s 1.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Severability—1994 c 271: See notes following RCW 9A.28.020.